Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.560

Monetary performance-based awards or incentives—Restrictions.

From February 15, 2010, until June 30, 2013, no monetary performance-based awards or incentives may be granted by the director or employers to employees covered by rules adopted under this section. This section does not prohibit the payment of awards provided for in chapter 41.60 RCW. For institutions of higher education, this section does not prohibit the payment of specific cash awards from private donations from individuals or businesses including, but not limited to, endowments.

From July 1, 2011, until June 30, 2013, no performance-based awards or incentives may be granted by the director or employers to employees pursuant to a performance management confirmation granted by the department of personnel under WAC 357-37-055.

[ 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 916; 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 11; 2010 c 2 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 2nd sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 39: See note following RCW 41.04.820.

Findings—Effective date—2010 c 2: See notes following RCW 41.06.070.